Hawaii statutes.
§605-15.2 Remedies. Remedies for the
violation of section 605-14 shall include injunctive and declaratory relief,
and other existing remedies. In addition, the attorney general may maintain a
criminal action against any person who violates section 605-14, the penalties
for which are set forth in section 605-17. [L 1975, c 45, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Authorization of attorney general and bar association to seek
relief under statute exclusive. 59 H. 503, 584 P.2d 107.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next